Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.438, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. A person shall not operate on the highway a motor vehicle equipped with a front windshield, a any of the following: (1) A front windshield that meets a minimum standard of transparency of less than seventy percent light transmittance. (2) A side window to the immediate right or left of the driver, or a sidewing forward of and to the left or right of the driver which is excessively dark or reflective so that it is difficult for a person outside the motor vehicle to see into the motor vehicle through the windshield, window, or sidewing , that meets a minimum standard of transparency of less than fifty percent light transmittance . a. The department shall adopt rules establishing a minimum measurable standard of transparency which shall apply to violations of this subsection . b. This subsection does not apply to a person who operates a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local House File 766, p. 2 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs official duties. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 766, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor